District of Columbia statutes.
8-104.05

Fertilizer labeling requirements.

(a)

A fertilizer used on turf that is distributed or sold in the District shall include a legible label with at least the following information:

(1)

The percentage of total nitrogen, including the percentage of other water soluble nitrogen and water insoluble nitrogen;

(2)

The percentage of available phosphate;

(3)

The percentage of soluble potash; and

(4)

(A)

The following statement:

“Do not apply near water, storm drains or drainage ditches. Do not apply if heavy rain is expected. Apply this product only to your lawn, and sweep any product that lands on the driveway, sidewalk, or street back onto your lawn.”; or

(B)

The environmental hazard statement recommended by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency for that product.

(b)

The information required under subsection (a)(4) of this section shall be printed in a legible and conspicuous manner on at least one side of the container, or, if it does not appear on the face or display side of the container, it shall appear on the upper third of the side used.

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 205, 60 DCR 1300